Washington statutes.
RCW 28A.210.340

Students with diabetes—Adoption of policy for inservice training for school staff.

The superintendent of public instruction and the secretary of the department of health shall develop a uniform policy for all school districts providing for the inservice training for school staff on symptoms, treatment, and monitoring of students with diabetes and on the additional observations that may be needed in different situations that may arise during the school day and during school-sponsored events. The policy shall include the standards and skills that must be in place for inservice training of school staff.

[ 2002 c 350 s 3.]

NOTES:

Findings—Effective date—2002 c 350: See notes following RCW 28A.210.330.